Connecticut, session 2026, HB05144.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the sum of ____ dollars be appropriated to the Department of
Education, from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, to provide (1) breakfasts to students at no cost at schools
participating in the school breakfast program, and (2) lunch to students,
who are eligible for reduced-price meals, at no cost at schools
participating in the school lunch program.